Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2214
Motor fuel storage tanks; requirements; not applicable, when.

Subsection (2) of section 66-2211 shall not apply to a retail motor fuel site if all of the motor fuel storage tanks located at such site are listed with the State Fire Marshal as falling within one of the following categories:

(1) Each motor fuel storage tank not constructed of fiberglass was installed during or prior to 1985; or

(2) Each motor fuel storage tank constructed of fiberglass was installed during or prior to:

(a) For a double-wall fiberglass underground motor fuel storage tank, 1991; or

(b) For a single-wall fiberglass underground motor fuel storage tank, 1996.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 7.